Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB533.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "serious medical condition" in section 103 of the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Serious medical condition." Any of the following:(1) Cancer, including remission therapy.(2) Positive status for human immunodeficiency virus or acquired immune deficiency syndrome.(3) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis.(4) Parkinson's disease.(5) Multiple sclerosis.(6) Damage to the nervous tissue of the central nervous system (brain-spinal cord) with objective neurological indication of intractable spasticity and other associated neuropathies.(7) Epilepsy.(8) Inflammatory bowel disease.(9) Neuropathies.(10) Huntington's disease.(11) Crohn's disease.(12) Post-traumatic stress disorder.(13) Intractable seizures.(14) Glaucoma.(15) Sickle cell anemia.(16) Severe chronic or intractable pain of neuropathic origin or severe chronic or intractable pain.(17) Autism.(17.1) A condition deemed a serious medical condition by a practitioner.(18) Other conditions that are recommended by the advisory board and approved by the secretary under section 1202.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0533PN0526 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930